West Virginia, session 2026, HB4968.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 21. PERSONAL INCOME TAX. §11-21-12o. Additional modification of adjusted gross income of West Virginia of resident individual. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, an additional modification reducing federal adjusted gross income is hereby authorized in an amount equal to the first $20,000 of income of a West Virginia resident individual, or of a husband and wife whose West Virginia taxable income is determined jointly.